algorithm/arabic_root.sbl
                // Shaped forms
                '{o1}' ( <- '{o}' ) // HAMZA
                '{ao1}' '{ao2}'  ( <- '{ao}' ) // ALEF_HAMZA_ABOVE
                '{ao_1}' '{ao_2}' ( <- '{ao_}' ) // ALEF_HAMZA_BELOW
                '{yo1}'  '{yo2}' '{yo3}'  '{yo4}'  ( <- '{yo}' ) // YEH_HAMZA
                '{a~1}'  '{a~2}'( <- '{a~}' ) // ALEF_MADDA
                '{wo1}' '{wo2}'( <- '{wo}' ) // WAW_HAMZA
                '{a1}' '{a2}' ( <- '{a}' ) // ALEF
                '{b1}' '{b2}' '{b3}'  '{b4}'  ( <- '{b}' ) // BEH
                '{t_1}'  '{t_2}' ( <- '{t_}' ) // TEH_MARBUTA
                '{t1}'   '{t2}' '{t3}' '{t4}'  ( <- '{t}' ) // TEH
                '{th1}' '{th2}' '{th3}' '{th4}' ( <- '{th}' ) // THEH
                '{j1}' '{j2}'  '{j3}' '{j4}'(  <- '{j}' ) // JEEM
                '{h1}' '{h2}' '{h3}' '{h4}' ( <- '{h}' ) // HAH
                '{x1}' '{x2}' '{x3}' '{x4}'( <- '{x}' ) // KHAH
                '{d1}'  '{d2}'  ( <- '{d}' ) // DAL
                '{dz1}''{dz2}' ( <- '{dz}' ) // THAL
                '{r1}' '{r2}'( <- '{r}' ) // REH
                '{z1}' '{z2}'  ( <- '{z}' ) // ZAIN
                '{s1}'  '{s2}'   '{s3}' '{s4}'( <- '{s}' ) // SEEN
                '{sh1}' '{sh2}' '{sh3}' '{sh4}' ( <- '{sh}' ) // SHEEN
                '{c1}' '{c2}' '{c3}' '{c4}'( <- '{c}' ) // SAD
                '{dh1}'    '{dh2}'   '{dh3}'  '{dh4}'( <- '{dh}' ) // DAD
                '{tt1}'  '{tt2}'  '{tt3}'  '{tt4}' ( <- '{tt}' ) // TAH
                '{zh1}' '{zh2}' '{zh3}'    '{zh4}'( <- '{zh}' ) // ZAH
                '{i1}' '{i2}' '{i3}'  '{i4}'( <- '{i}' ) // AIN
                '{gh1}' '{gh2}' '{gh3}'  '{gh4}'( <- '{gh}' ) // GHAIN
                '{f1}'  '{f2}' '{f3}'  '{f4}' ( <- '{f}' ) // FEH
                '{q1}' '{q2}' '{q3}' '{q4}' ( <- '{q}' ) // QAF
                '{k1}' '{k2}' '{k3}'  '{k4}'( <- '{k}' ) // KAF
                '{l1}' '{l2}' '{l3}' '{l4}'( <- '{l}' ) // LAM
                '{m1}' '{m2}'  '{m3}' '{m4}'   ( <- '{m}' ) // MEEM
                '{n1}'  '{n2}' '{n3}'  '{n4}'( <- '{n}' ) // NOON
                '{e1}' '{e2}' '{e3}' '{e4}' ( <- '{e}' ) // HEH
                '{w1}'  '{w2}'  ( <- '{w}' ) // WAW
                '{a_1}' '{a_2}' ( <- '{a_}' ) // ALEF_MAKSURA
                '{y1}' '{y2}' '{y3}' '{y4}' ( <- '{y}' ) // YEH

                // Ligatures Lam-Alef
                '{la}'  '{la2}'     (<- '{l}{a}')
                '{lao}'  '{lao2}'   (<- '{l}{ao}')
                '{lao_}'  '{lao_2}' (<- '{l}{ao_}')
                '{la~}'  '{la~2}'    (<- '{l}{a~}')

            )
        )
        or
        next
    )
)

define Normalize_post as (

    do (
        // normalize last hamza
        backwards (
        [substring] among (
            '{ao}''{ao_}' '{a~}' ( <- '{o}')
            '{wo}' ( <- '{o}')
            '{yo}' ( <- '{o}')
        )
        )
    )

    do loop word_len (
        (
        // normalize other hamza's
            [substring] among (
                '{ao}''{ao_}' '{a~}' ( <- '{a}')
                '{wo}' ( <- '{w}')
                '{yo}' ( <- '{y}')
            )
        )
        or
        next
    )
)

// Checks
define Checks1 as (
    $word_len = len
    [substring] among (
        '{b}{a}{l}' '{k}{a}{l}' ($word_len > 4  set is_noun  unset is_verb set is_defined)
        '{l}{l}' '{a}{l}' ($word_len > 3  set is_noun unset is_verb set is_defined)

    )
)

backwardmode (
		define Checks2 as (
		    $word_len = len
		    [substring] among (
		        '{t_}' ($word_len > 2  set is_noun  unset is_verb)
            '{a}{t}' ($word_len > 3 set is_noun unset is_verb) // female plural
            '{t}{a}{n}' '{t}{y}{n}' ($word_len >= 5 set is_noun unset is_verb)
		    )
		)
)
// patterns handlers
define Check_Pattern1 as ( // pattern 4 length guessing
        => root_test
        $root_test
        (
         do (['{m}'] set meem_found)
         do ([next] ['{a}'] set alef_found )
         do ( hop 2 [v] set v_found)
        )
)
define Pattern_Step1a as ( // فاعل when fa = meem
            $fa = '{m}'
            hop 2
            [all_letters]
            -> ain
            // hop 1
            [all_letters]
            -> lam1
            set root_found
)
define Pattern_Step1a1 as ( // مفعل
      [all_letters]
      -> fa
      [all_letters]
      -> ain
      hop 1
      [all_letters]
      -> lam1
      set root_found
)
define Pattern_Step1a2 as ( // فعول /فعيل /فعال when fa == meem
      hop 1
      [all_letters]
      -> fa
      // hop 1
      [all_letters]
      -> ain
      [all_letters]
      -> lam1
      set root_found
)
define Pattern_Step1b as ( // فاعل usual case
      [all_letters]
      -> fa
      hop 1
      [all_letters]
      -> ain
      [all_letters]
      -> lam1
      set root_found
)
define Pattern_Step1c as ( // فعال فعول فعيل normal case
        [all_letters]
        -> fa
        [all_letters]
        -> ain
        hop 1
        [non-v]
        -> lam1
        set root_found
)

define Pattern_Step1c1 as ( // افعل /نفعل/يفعل/تفعل
       $word_len = len
       [substring] among (
          '{a}' '{n}' '{y}' '{t}' ($word_len == 4 delete)
       )
)

define Checks_Pattern2 as (
        => root_test
        => root_test1
        => root_test2
        => root_test3
        => root_test4
        $root_test ( // Pattern_Step2a guessing
              do ([g1] set case1)
              do (hop 2 [g2] set case2)
        )
        $root_test1 (// Pattern_Step2a1 guessing
                do ([g3] set case3)
                do (hop 3 [v] set case4)
        )
        $root_test2 ( // Pattern_Step2c2 guessing
              do ( hop 2 ['{a}{y}'] set case5 )
        )
        $root_test3 ( // Pattern_Step2c4 guessing
              do ( hop 1 ['{w}{a}'] set case6)
        )
        $root_test4 ( // Pattern_Step2c guessing
             do ( hop 1 ['{a}'] hop 1 ['{w}'] set case7 )
        )
)

define Pattern_Step2a as ( // افتعل/افاعل/مفتعل/يفتعل/تفتعل/مفاعل/ تفاعل
        hop 1
        [all_letters]
        -> fa
        hop 1
        [all_letters]
        -> ain
        [all_letters]
        -> lam1
        set root_found
)

define Pattern_Step2a1 as ( // مفعول /مفعيل/افاعل/تفعيل
        hop 1
        [all_letters]
        -> fa
        [all_letters]
        -> ain
        hop 1
        [all_letters]
        -> lam1
        set root_found
)

define Pattern_Step2b as ( // انفعل/منفعل
      $word_len = len
      [substring] among (
          '{a}{n}' '{m}{n}' ($word_len == 5 delete)
      )
)

define Pattern_Step2c as ( // فاعول
      [all_letters]
      -> fa
      hop 1
      [all_letters]
      -> ain
      hop 1
      [all_letters]
      -> lam1
      set root_found
)

define Pattern_Step2c2 as ( // فعائل
       [all_letters]
       -> fa
       [all_letters]
       -> ain
       hop 2
       [all_letters]
       -> lam1
       set root_found
)

// define Pattern_Step2c3 as ( // فعالي/فعولة/فعالة
    //   [all_letters]
    //   -> fa
    //   [all_letters]
    //   -> ain
    //   hop 1
    //   [all_letters]
    //   -> lam1
    //   set root_found
//)

define Pattern_Step2c4 as ( // فواعل
       [all_letters]
       -> fa
       hop 2
       [all_letters]
       -> ain
       [all_letters]
       -> lam1
       set root_found
)

define Pattern_Checks3 as (
      => root_test
      => root_test1
      $root_test ( // guessing  Pattern_Step3b
          do (
              [g2] hop 1 [g2] hop 1 [g4] set case8)
          )
      $root_test1 ( // guessing Pattern_Step3c
          do
          (
              hop 2
              [all_letters]
              -> ch
              hop 1
              [all_letters]
              -> ch1
              $ch ch1
              set case9
          )
      )
)
define Pattern_Step3a as ( // مستفعل/استفعل
        $word_len = len
        [substring] among (
              '{m}{s}{t}' '{a}{s}{t}' ($word_len == 6 delete)
        )
)
define Pattern_Step3b as ( // افتعال/تفاعيل
        hop 1
        [all_letters]
        -> fa
        hop 1
        [all_letters]
        -> ain
        hop 1
        [all_letters]
        -> lam1
        set root_found
)
define Pattern_Step3c as ( // افعوعل
      hop 1
      [all_letters]
      -> fa
      hop 2
      [all_letters]
      -> ain
      [all_letters]
      -> lam1
      set root_found
)
//prefixes
define Prefix_Step1 as (
        $word_len = len
         [substring] among (
             '{ao}{ao}' ($word_len > 3 <-  '{ao}'  )
             '{ao}{a~}' ($word_len > 3 <-  '{a~}'  )
             '{ao}{wo}' ($word_len > 3 <-  '{ao}'  )
             '{ao}{a}' ($word_len > 3 <-  '{a}'  )
             '{ao}{ao_}' ($word_len > 3 <-  '{ao_}'  )
            // '{ao}' ($word_len > 3 delete) //rare case
        )
)

define Prefix_Step2a as (
        $word_len = len
        [substring] among (
            '{f}{a}{l}' ($word_len > 5 delete)
            '{w}{a}{l}' ($word_len > 5 delete)
        )
)

define Prefix_Step2b as (
        $word_len = len
        not '{f}{a}'
        not '{w}{a}'
        [substring] among (
            '{f}' ($word_len > 3 delete)
            '{w}' ($word_len > 3 delete)
        )
)

define Prefix_Step3a_Noun as ( // it is noun and defined
        $word_len = len
        [substring] among (
            '{b}{a}{l}' '{k}{a}{l}' ($word_len > 5 delete)
            '{l}{l}' '{a}{l}' ($word_len > 4 delete)
        )
)

define Prefix_Step3b_Noun as ( // probably  noun and defined
        $word_len = len
        not '{b}{a}' // exception
        [substring] among (
            '{b}' ($word_len > 3 delete)
            '{k}'  ($word_len > 4 delete) // BUG: cause confusion
            '{l}' ($word_len > 4 delete) // BUG: cause confusion
            '{b}{b}' ($word_len > 3 <-  '{b}'  )
            '{k}{k}'  ($word_len > 3 <-  '{k}'  )
           )

)

define Prefix_Step3_Verb as (
        $word_len = len
        [substring] among (
            //'{s}' ($word_len > 4 delete)// BUG: cause confusion
            '{s}{y}' ($word_len > 4 <- '{y}' )
            '{s}{t}' ($word_len > 4 <- '{t}')
            '{s}{n}' ($word_len > 4 <- '{n}')
            '{s}{ao}' ($word_len > 4 <- '{ao}')
        )
)

define Prefix_Step4_Verb as (
        $word_len = len
        [substring] among (
            '{y}{s}{t}' '{n}{s}{t}' '{t}{s}{t}' ($word_len > 4 set is_verb unset is_noun <-  '{a}{s}{t}' )
        )
)
define Prefix_Step5_Verb as (
       $word_len = len
       [substring] among (
         '{a}' ($word_len == 6 delete)
       )
)
// suffixes
backwardmode (
        define Pattern_Step2c1 as ( // فعلاء/فعلان/.
            $word_len = len
            [substring] among (
                  '{a}{n}' '{a}{o}' ($word_len == 5 delete)
            )
        )
        define Suffix_Noun_Step1a as (
                $word_len = len
                [substring] among (
                        '{y}' '{k}' '{e}' ($word_len >= 4 delete)
                        '{n}{a}' '{k}{m}' '{e}{a}' '{e}{n}' '{e}{m}' ($word_len >= 5  delete)
                        '{k}{m}{a}' '{e}{m}{a}' ($word_len >= 6 delete)
                )
            )
        define Suffix_Noun_Step1b as (
            $word_len = len
            [substring] among (
                '{n}' ($word_len > 5 delete)
            )
        )

        define Suffix_Noun_Step2a as (
                $word_len = len
                [substring] among (
                        '{a}' '{y}' '{w}' ($word_len > 4 delete)
                )
            )

        define Suffix_Noun_Step2b as (
            $word_len = len
            [substring] among (
                '{a}{t}' ($word_len >= 5 delete)
            )
        )
